Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.15.005

"Colleges and universities" defined.

(1) "Colleges and universities" for the purposes of this chapter shall mean Central Washington University at Ellensburg, Eastern Washington University at Cheney, Western Washington University at Bellingham, The Evergreen State College in Thurston county, community colleges as are provided for in chapter 28B.50 RCW, the University of Washington, and Washington State University.

(2) "State universities" for the purposes of this chapter shall mean the University of Washington and Washington State University.

(3) "Regional universities" for the purposes of this chapter shall mean Central Washington University, Eastern Washington University and Western Washington University.

[ 1977 ex.s. c 169 s 33; 1971 ex.s. c 279 s 1.]

NOTES:

Severability—Nomenclature—Savings—1977 ex.s. c 169: See notes following RCW 28B.10.016.

Severability—1971 ex.s. c 279: "If any provision of this 1971 amendatory act, or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the remainder of the act, or the application of the provision to other persons or circumstances is not affected." [ 1971 ex.s. c 279 s 25.]